kazakh.sbl
stringescapes {}

externals ( stem )

stringdef a '{U+0430}'
stringdef b '{U+0431}'
stringdef v '{U+0432}'
stringdef g '{U+0433}'
stringdef d '{U+0434}'
stringdef e '{U+0435}'
stringdef yo '{U+0451}'
stringdef zh '{U+0436}'
stringdef z '{U+0437}'
stringdef i '{U+0438}'
stringdef yi '{U+0439}'
stringdef k '{U+043A}'
stringdef l '{U+043B}'
stringdef m '{U+043C}'
stringdef n '{U+043D}'
stringdef o '{U+043E}'
stringdef p '{U+043F}'
stringdef r '{U+0440}'
stringdef s '{U+0441}'
stringdef t '{U+0442}'
stringdef u '{U+0443}'
stringdef f '{U+0444}'
stringdef kh '{U+0445}'
stringdef ts '{U+0446}'
stringdef ch '{U+0447}'
stringdef sh '{U+0448}'
stringdef shch '{U+0449}'
stringdef soft '{U+044C}'
stringdef y '{U+044B}'
stringdef hard '{U+044A}'
stringdef ee '{U+044D}'
stringdef iu '{U+044E}'
stringdef ia '{U+044F}'
stringdef shva '{U+04D9}'
stringdef gh '{U+0493}'
stringdef khh '{U+049B}'
stringdef nh '{U+04A3}'
stringdef oe '{U+04E9}'
stringdef uh '{U+04B1}'
stringdef ii '{U+0456}'

stringdef A '{U+0410}'
stringdef B '{U+0411}'
stringdef V '{U+0412}'
stringdef G '{U+0413}'
stringdef D '{U+0414}'
stringdef E '{U+0415}'
stringdef YO '{U+0401}'
stringdef ZH '{U+0416}'
stringdef Z '{U+0417}'
stringdef I '{U+0418}'
stringdef YI '{U+0419}'
stringdef K '{U+041A}'
stringdef L '{U+041B}'
stringdef M '{U+041C}'
stringdef N '{U+041D}'
stringdef O '{U+041E}'
stringdef P '{U+041F}'
stringdef R '{U+0420}'
stringdef S '{U+0421}'
stringdef T '{U+0422}'
stringdef U '{U+0423}'
stringdef F '{U+0424}'
stringdef KH '{U+0425}'
stringdef TS '{U+0426}'
stringdef CH '{U+0427}'
stringdef SH '{U+0428}'
stringdef SHCH '{U+0429}'
stringdef SOFT '{U+042C}'
stringdef Y '{U+042B}'
stringdef HARD '{U+042A}'
stringdef EE '{U+042D}'
stringdef IU '{U+042E}'
stringdef IA '{U+042F}'
stringdef SHVA '{U+04D8}'
stringdef GH '{U+0492}'
stringdef KHH '{U+049A}'
stringdef NH '{U+04A2}'
stringdef OE '{U+04E8}'
stringdef UH '{U+04B0}'
stringdef II '{U+0406}'

groupings ( )

routines ( tolower step1 )

backwardmode (
    define tolower as (
        repeat (
          [substring] among (
              '{A}' (<- '{a}')
              '{B}' (<- '{b}')
              '{V}' (<- '{v}')
              '{G}' (<- '{g}')
              '{D}' (<- '{d}')
              '{E}' (<- '{e}')
              '{YO}' (<- '{yo}')
              '{ZH}' (<- '{zh}')
              '{Z}' (<- '{z}')
              '{I}' (<- '{i}')
              '{YI}' (<- '{yi}')
              '{K}' (<- '{k}')
              '{L}' (<- '{l}')
              '{M}' (<- '{m}')
              '{N}' (<- '{n}')
              '{O}' (<- '{o}')
              '{P}' (<- '{p}')
              '{R}' (<- '{r}')
              '{S}' (<- '{s}')
              '{T}' (<- '{t}')
              '{U}' (<- '{u}')
              '{F}' (<- '{f}')
              '{KH}' (<- '{kh}')
              '{TS}' (<- '{ts}')
              '{CH}' (<- '{ch}')
              '{SH}' (<- '{sh}')
              '{SHCH}' (<- '{shch}')
              '{SOFT}' (<- '{soft}')
              '{Y}' (<- '{y}')
              '{HARD}' (<- '{hard}')
              '{EE}' (<- '{ee}')
              '{IU}' (<- '{iu}')
              '{IA}' (<- '{ia}')
              '{SHVA}' (<- '{shva}')
              '{GH}' (<- '{gh}')
              '{KHH}' (<- '{khh}')
              '{NH}' (<- '{nh}')
              '{OE}' (<- '{oe}')
              '{UH}' (<- '{uh}')
              '{II}' (<- '{ii}')
              '' (next)
            )
        )
    )

    define step1 as (
        [substring] among (
            '{sh}{a}{l}{y}{khh}' //шалық
            '{sh}{e}{l}{ii}{k}' //шелік
            '{d}{a}{gh}{a}{n}' //даған
            '{d}{e}{g}{e}{n}' //деген
            '{t}{a}{gh}{a}{n}' //таған
            '{t}{e}{g}{e}{n}' //теген
            '{l}{a}{gh}{a}{n}' //лаған
            '{l}{e}{g}{e}{n}' //леген
            '{d}{a}{yi}{y}{n}' //дайын
            '{d}{e}{yi}{ii}{n}' //дейін
            '{t}{a}{yi}{y}{n}' //тайын
            '{t}{e}{yi}{ii}{n}' //тейін
            '{nh}{d}{a}{r}' //ңдар
            '{nh}{d}{e}{r}' //ңдер
            '{d}{ii}{k}{ii}' //дікі
            '{t}{ii}{k}{ii}' //тікі
            '{n}{ii}{k}{ii}' //нікі
            '{a}{t}{y}{n}' //атын
            '{e}{t}{ii}{n}' //етін
            '{yi}{t}{y}{n}' //йтын
            '{yi}{t}{ii}{n}' //йтін
            '{g}{e}{l}{ii}' //гелі
            '{khh}{a}{l}{y}' //қалы
            '{k}{e}{l}{ii}' //келі
            '{gh}{a}{l}{y}' //ғалы
            '{sh}{a}{m}{a}' //шама
            '{sh}{e}{m}{e}' //шеме
            '{m}{y}{n}' //мын
            '{m}{ii}{n}' //мін
            '{b}{y}{n}' //бын
            '{b}{ii}{n}' //бін
            '{p}{y}{n}' //пын
            '{p}{ii}{n}' //пін
            '{m}{y}{z}' //мыз
            '{m}{ii}{z}' //міз
            '{b}{y}{z}' //быз
            '{b}{ii}{z}' //біз
            '{p}{y}{z}' //пыз
            '{p}{ii}{z}' //піз
            '{s}{y}{nh}' //сың
            '{s}{ii}{nh}' //сің
            '{s}{y}{z}' //сыз
            '{s}{ii}{z}' //сіз
            '{nh}{y}{z}' //ңыз
            '{nh}{ii}{z}' //ңіз
            '{d}{a}{n}' //дан
            '{d}{e}{n}' //ден
            '{t}{a}{n}' //тан
            '{t}{e}{n}' //тен
            '{n}{a}{n}' //нан
            '{n}{e}{n}' //нен
            '{n}{d}{a}' //нда
            '{n}{d}{e}' //нде
            '{d}{y}{nh}' //дың
            '{d}{ii}{nh}' //дің
            '{t}{y}{nh}' //тың
            '{t}{ii}{nh}' //тің
            '{n}{y}{nh}' //ның
            '{n}{ii}{nh}' //нің
            '{d}{a}{r}' //дар
            '{d}{e}{r}' //дер
            '{t}{a}{r}' //тар
            '{t}{e}{r}' //тер
            '{l}{a}{r}' //лар
            '{l}{e}{r}' //лер
            '{b}{e}{n}' //бен
            '{p}{e}{n}' //пен
            '{m}{e}{n}' //мен
            '{d}{a}{yi}' //дай
            '{d}{e}{yi}' //дей
            '{t}{a}{yi}' //тай
            '{t}{e}{yi}' //тей
            '{d}{y}{khh}' //дық
            '{d}{ii}{k}' //дік
            '{t}{y}{khh}' //тық
            '{t}{ii}{k}' //тік
            '{l}{y}{khh}' //лық
            '{l}{ii}{k}' //лік
            '{p}{a}{z}' //паз
            '{gh}{y}{sh}' //ғыш
            '{g}{ii}{sh}' //гіш
            '{khh}{y}{sh}' //қыш
            '{k}{ii}{sh}' //кіш
            '{sh}{e}{k}' //шек
            '{sh}{a}{khh}' //шақ
            '{sh}{y}{l}' //шыл
            '{sh}{ii}{l}' //шіл
            '{n}{sh}{ii}' //нші
            '{n}{sh}{y}' //ншы
            '{d}{a}{p}' //дап
            '{d}{e}{p}' //деп
            '{t}{a}{p}' //тап
            '{t}{e}{p}' //теп
            '{l}{a}{p}' //лап
            '{l}{e}{p}' //леп
            '{d}{a}c' //даc
            '{d}{e}c' //деc
            '{t}{a}c' //таc
            '{t}{e}c' //теc
            '{l}{a}c' //лаc
            '{l}{e}c' //леc
            '{gh}{a}{r}' //ғар
            '{g}{e}{r}' //гер
            '{khh}{a}{r}' //қар
            '{k}{e}{r}' //кер
            '{d}{y}{r}' //дыр
            '{d}{ii}{r}' //дір
            '{t}{y}{r}' //тыр
            '{t}{ii}{r}' //тір
            '{gh}{y}{z}' //ғыз
            '{g}{ii}{z}' //гіз
            '{khh}{y}{z}' //қыз
            '{k}{ii}{z}' //кіз
            '{gh}{a}{n}' //ған
            '{g}{e}{n}' //ген
            '{khh}{a}{n}' //қан
            '{k}{e}{n}' //кен
            '{u}{sh}{y}' //ушы
            '{u}{sh}{ii}' //уші
            '{l}{a}{yi}' //лай
            '{l}{e}{yi}' //лей
            '{s}{y}{n}' //сын
            '{s}{ii}{n}' //сін
            '{b}{a}{khh}' //бақ
            '{b}{e}{k}' //бек
            '{p}{a}{khh}' //пақ
            '{p}{e}{k}' //пек
            '{m}{a}{khh}' //мақ
            '{m}{e}{k}' //мек
            '{yi}{y}{n}' //йын
            '{yi}{ii}{n}' //йін
            '{yi}{y}{khh}' //йық
            '{yi}{ii}{k}' //йік
            '{s}{y}' //сы
            '{s}{ii}' //сі
            '{d}{a}' //да
            '{d}{e}' //де
            '{t}{a}' //та
            '{t}{e}' //те
            '{gh}{a}' //ға
            '{g}{e}' //ге
            '{khh}{a}' //қа
            '{k}{e}' //ке
            '{n}{a}' //на
            '{n}{e}' //не
            '{d}{ii}' //ді
            '{t}{y}' //ты
            '{t}{ii}' //ті
            '{n}{y}' //ны
            '{n}{ii}' //ні
            '{d}{y}' //ды
            '{b}{a}' //ба
            '{b}{e}' //бе
            '{p}{a}' //па
            '{p}{e}' //пе
            '{m}{a}' //ма
            '{m}{e}' //ме
            '{l}{y}' //лы
            '{l}{ii}' //лі
            '{gh}{y}' //ғы
            '{g}{ii}' //гі
            '{khh}{y}' //қы
            '{k}{ii}' //кі
            '{a}{u}' //ау
            '{e}{u}' //еу
            '{l}{a}' //ла
            '{l}{e}' //ле
            '{a}{r}' //ар
            '{e}{r}' //ер
            '{y}{p}' //ып
            '{ii}{p}' //іп
            '{sh}{a}' //ша
            '{sh}{e}' //ше
            '{s}{a}' //са
            '{s}{e}' //се
            '{n}' //н
            '{r}' //р
            '{p}' //п
            '{yi}' //й
            '{y}' //ы
            '{ii}' //і
        )
        delete
    )
)

define stem as (
    // We assume in this implementation that the whole word doesn't count
    // as a valid suffix to remove, so we remove the longest suffix from
    // the list which leaves at least one character.  This change affects
    // 47 words out of the 65,140 in the sample vocabulary from Hindi
    // wikipedia.
    //
    // The trick here is we use `next` in forward mode to advance the cursor
    // to the second character, then `backwards` swaps the cursor and limit.
    backwards (
        do tolower
        do step1
    )
)
